Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2407
Bonds, defined.

Bonds shall mean any bonds, interim certificates, notes, debentures, or other evidences of indebtedness of an agency.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 7.